Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201417-306.01
Village reorganized from city of
second class; discontinuation; reorganize as city of the second class; petition;
election.

(1)
The registered voters of a village which was reorganized under section 17-306
from a city of the second class to a village may vote to discontinue organization
as a village and reorganize as a city of the second class under this section
if the population exceeds eight hundred inhabitants. The issue may be placed
before the voters by a resolution adopted by the board of trustees of the
village or by petition signed by one-fourth of the registered voters of the
village.

(2) The petitions shall
conform to section 32-628. The Secretary of State shall design the form to
be used for the petitions. Petition signers and petition circulators shall
conform to the requirements of sections 32-629 and 32-630. The board of trustees
shall submit the petitions to the election commissioner or county clerk for
signature verification pursuant to section 32-631. The required number of
signatures shall be one-fourth of the number of voters registered in the village
at the last statewide general election. The election commissioner or county
clerk shall notify the board of trustees within thirty days after receiving
the petitions from the board of trustees whether the required number of signatures
has been gathered. The village shall reimburse the county for any costs incurred
by the election commissioner or county clerk.

(3) If the board of trustees determines
that the petitions are in proper form and signed by the necessary number of
registered voters or after adoption of the resolution by the board of trustees,
the board of trustees shall submit the question to the voters of whether to
organize as a city of the second class at a special election pursuant to section
32-559 or at the same time as a local or statewide primary or general election
held in the village. The form of the ballot at such election shall be For
reorganization of the Village of ......... as a city of the second class and
Against reorganization of the Village of ........ as a city of the second
class.

(4)
If the majority of the votes cast are for reorganization as a city of the
second class, the board of trustees shall certify such fact to the Secretary
of State who, upon the filing of such a certificate, shall by proclamation
so declare and shall declare such village to have become a city of the second
class. Thereafter such village shall become a city of the second class and
such city shall be governed under the laws of this state applicable to cities
of the second class. The government of such city shall continue as organized
at the date of such proclamation until the reorganization as a city of the
second class.

(5)
Upon such proclamation, the governing body of the city shall call a special
election for the purpose of electing new members of the city's governing body
to be held not more than eight months after the proclamation is issued. At
the initial election of officers, the names of the candidates receiving the
greatest number of votes at the primary election if one is held shall be placed
on the general election ballot. One-half or the bare majority of the candidates
in each precinct or ward or at-large candidates, as the case may be, receiving
the greatest number of votes at the general election, shall be elected to
terms of the longest duration, and those receiving the next greatest number
of votes shall be elected to the remaining term or terms. Thereafter all members
shall be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide
general election for four-year terms as provided in section 32-533. The members
of the board of trustees shall hold office only until the newly elected city
officials assume office.

(6)
All ordinances, bylaws, acts, rules, regulations, obligations, and proclamations
existing and in force in or with respect to any village at the time of its
incorporation as a city of the second class shall remain in full force and
effect after such incorporation as a city of the second class until repealed
or modified by such city within one year after the date of the filing of the
certificate pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Laws 2014, LB702, § 4.
April 11, 2014